es: Tipo ascendente/descendente: Descensor con autobloqueo; Abrazadera de cuerda con leva; Ascendedor de pecho; Ascendedor combinado; Descensor en 8; Ascendedor de pie; Ascendedor con puño; Ascendedor de rodilla; Polea con bloqueo de progreso; Descensor tubular; Otro
ja: アセンダー／ディセンダータイプ: オートロックディセンダー; カムロープクランプ; チェストアッセンダー; コンボアッセンダー; エイト環ディセンダー; フットアッセンダー; ハンドル付きアッセンダー; ニーアッセンダー; プログレスキャプチャプーリー; チューブディセンダー; その他
pt-BR: Tipo de dispositivo de subida ou descida: Descensor autoblocante; Bloqueador de corda com came; Ascensor de peito; Ascensor combinado; Descensor freio 8; Ascensor de pé; Ascensor de punho; Ascensor de joelho; Polia bloqueadora; Descensor tubular; Outro
zh-CN: 上升器/下降器类型: 自动上锁下降器; 凸轮抓绳器; 胸式上升器; 组合上升器; 8 字环下降器; 脚式上升器; 手持上升器; 膝式上升器; 单向防坠滑轮; 管式下降器; 其他
zh-TW: 上升器/下降器類型: 自動鎖定下降器; 凸輪抓繩器; 胸式上升器; 組合式上升器; 8 字環下降器; 腳式上升器; 手持式上升器; 膝蓋上升器; 單向滑輪; 管狀下降器; 其他
de: Steig-/Abstiegsleitertyp: Selbstblockierendes Abseilgerät; Seilklemme mit Nocken; Bruststeigklemme; Kombi-Steigklemme; Achter-Abseilgerät; Fußsteigklemme; Handsteigklemme; Kniesteigklemme; Umlenkrolle mit Rücklaufsperre; Tube-Abseilgerät; Sonstige
sl-SI: Vrsta prižeme za vzpenjanje/spuščanje: Samozaporna zavora za spuščanje; Zatična prižema za vrv; Prsna prižema; Kombinirana prižema; Zavora osmica; Nožna prižema; Ročna prižema; Kolenska prižema; Škripec s prižemo; Tubasta zavora; Drugo
th: ประเภทอุปกรณ์ไต่เชือกขึ้น/ลง: อุปกรณ์โรยตัวแบบล็อกอัตโนมัติ; แคมหนีบเชือก; อุปกรณ์ไต่เชือกที่หน้าอก; อุปกรณ์ไต่เชือกคอมโบ; อุปกรณ์โรยตัวรูปเลข 8; อุปกรณ์ไต่เชือกที่เท้า; อุปกรณ์ไต่เชือกแบบมีด้ามจับ; อุปกรณ์ไต่เชือกที่เข่า; รอกแบบล็อคเชือกกันตก; อุปกรณ์โรยตัวแบบหลอด; อื่นๆ
cs: Typ zvedacího/slaňovacího zařízení: Samosvorná brzda; Vačkový lanový blokant; Hrudní blokant; Kombinovaný blokant; Slaňovací osma; Nožní blokant; Ruční blokant; Kolenní blokant; Kladka s blokantem; Slaňovací kýbl; Ostatní
hu: Felszálló/leszálló típus: Önzáró ereszkedőeszköz; Kötélrögzítő; Mellkasi mászógép; Kombinált mászógép; Nyolcas ereszkedő; Lábgép; Kézi mászógép; Térdes mászógép; Visszafutásgátló csiga; Tubus; Egyéb
fi: Nousu-/laskeutumislaitteen tyyppi: Itselukkiutuva laskeutumislaite; Nousukahva; Rintanousulaite; Yhdistelmänousulaite; Kahdeksikko; Jalkanousulaite; Kahvallinen nousulaite; Polvinousulaite; Taljapyörä lukkiutumistoiminnolla; Putkilaskeutumislaite; Muu
hr-HR: Vrsta penjača/spuštača: Samosigurnosna spuštalica; Stezaljka za uže s brijegom; Prsna penjalica; Kombinirana penjalica; Osmica za spuštanje; Nožna penjalica; Penjalica s ručkom; Penjalica za koljeno; Koloturnik sa stezaljkom; Cijevna spuštalica (tube); Ostalo
pl: Typ przyrządu zaciskowego/zjazdowego: Przyrząd zjazdowy samoblokujący; Zacisk linowy z krzywką; Przyrząd zaciskowy piersiowy; Przyrząd zaciskowy wielofunkcyjny (combo); Ósemka zjazdowa; Przyrząd zaciskowy nożny; Przyrząd zaciskowy z rączką; Przyrząd zaciskowy kolanowy; Bloczek z blokadą; Kubek zjazdowy; Inne
en: Ascender/descender type: Auto-locking descender; Cam rope clamp; Chest ascender; Combo ascender; Figure 8 descender; Foot ascender; Handled ascender; Knee ascender; Progress-capture pulley; Tube descender; Other
fr: Type d’aspiration/suralimentation: Descendeur autobloquant; Bloqueur à came; Bloqueur de torse; Bloqueur combiné; Descendeur en 8; Bloqueur de pied; Poignée d’ascension; Bloqueur de genou; Poulie bloqueur; Descendeur tubulaire; Autre
it: Tipo di salita/discesa: Discensore autobloccante; Bloccante a camma; Bloccante ventrale; Bloccante combinato; Discensore a 8; Bloccante da piede; Maniglia bloccante; Bloccante da ginocchio; Carrucola bloccante; Discensore a secchiello; Altro
bg-BG: Тип повдигач/спускател: Десандьор с автоматично блокиране; Ексцентричен самохват; Гръден самохват; Комбиниран самохват; Десандьор осмица; Самохват за крак; Самохват с дръжка; Самохват за коляно; Блокираща макара; Тръбен десандьор; Друго
sk-SK: Typ dolného doťahu a horného doťahu: Samoblokovacia zlaňovacia brzda; Vačkový blokant; Hrudný blokant; Kombinovaný blokant; Zlaňovacia osma; Nožný blokant; Ručný blokant; Kolenný blokant; Kladka s blokantom; Zlaňovací kýblik; Iné
nl: Ascender/descender type: Zelfblokkerend afdaalapparaat; Nokkenklem; Borststijgklem; Gecombineerde stijgklem; Achtje (afdaalapparaat); Voetstijgklem; Handstijgklem; Kniestijgklem; Katrol met teruglooprem; Zekeringsapparaat (tube); Overige
el: Τύπος αναβατήρα/καταβατήρα: Εξοπλισμός κατάβασης με αυτόματο κλείδωμα; Σφιγκτήρας σχοινιού με έκκεντρο; Εξοπλισμός ανάβασης στήθους; Συνδυαστικός εξοπλισμός ανάβασης; Εξοπλισμός κατάβασης οκτάρι; Εξοπλισμός ανάβασης ποδιού; Εξοπλισμός ανάβασης χειρός; Εξοπλισμός ανάβασης γονάτου; Τροχαλία ανάσχεσης πτώσης; Σωληνοειδής εξοπλισμός κατάβασης; Άλλο
tr: Yükselici/iniş aleti tipi: Otomatik kilitlenen indirici; Kamlı ip tutucu; Göğüs jumarı; Kombine jumar; Sekizli indirici; Ayak jumarı; El jumarı; Diz jumarı; Kilitli makara; Tüp indirici; Diğer
ro-RO: Tipul de ascendent/descendent: Coborâtor cu autoblocare; Blocator de coardă cu camă; Blocator de piept; Blocator combinat; Coborâtor în formă de 8; Blocator de picior; Blocator de mână; Blocator de genunchi; Scripete cu blocator; Coborâtor tip tub; Altele
vi: Loại thiết bị leo/xuống: Dụng cụ đu dây tự khóa; Kẹp dây dạng cam; Dụng cụ leo dây đeo ngực; Dụng cụ leo dây kết hợp; Dụng cụ đu dây hình số 8; Dụng cụ leo dây đeo chân; Dụng cụ leo dây có tay cầm; Dụng cụ leo dây đeo đầu gối; Ròng rọc hãm dây; Dụng cụ đu dây dạng ống; Khác
sv: Uppstigande/nedstigande typ: Självlåsande nedfirningsdon; Repklämma med kam; Bröstklämma; Kombinationsklämma; Firningsåtta; Fotklämma; Repklämma med handtag; Knäklämma; Block med backspärr; Tubformad firningsbroms; Annat
ru: Тип устройства для спуска или подъема: Автоблокирующее спусковое устройство; Кулачковый зажим; Грудной зажим; Комбинированный зажим; Спусковое устройство «Восьмерка»; Ножной зажим; Ручной зажим (жумар); Коленный зажим; Блок-ролик с зажимом; Трубчатое спусковое устройство; Другое
lt-LT: Kilimo / nusileidimo įrenginių tipas: Savaime užsifiksuojantis nusileidimo įtaisas; Kumštelinis virvės gnybtas; Krūtininis pakilimo įtaisas; Kombinuotasis pakilimo įtaisas; Aštuoniukės formos nusileidimo įtaisas; Kojinis pakilimo įtaisas; Pakilimo įtaisas su rankena; Kelio pakilimo įtaisas; Skriemulys su eigos fiksatoriumi; Vamzdelinis nusileidimo įtaisas; Kita
da: Ascender-/descender-type: Selvlåsende nedfiringsbremse; Rebklemme med kam; Brystklemme; Kombineret rebklemme; Ottetal; Fodklemme; Håndklemme; Knæklemme; Remskive med tilbageløbsspærre; Rør-rebbremse; Andet
ko: 어센더/디센더 유형: 자동 잠금 하강기; 캠 로프 클램프; 가슴 등강기; 콤보 등강기; 8자형 하강기; 발 등강기; 손잡이형 등강기; 무릎 등강기; 진행 억제 도르래; 튜브형 하강기; 기타
pt-PT: Tipo ascendente/descendente: Descensor autobloqueante; Bloqueador de corda com came; Ascensor de peito; Ascensor combinado; Descensor em 8; Ascensor de pé; Ascensor de punho; Ascensor de joelho; Roldana com bloqueador; Descensor tubular; Outros
nb: Oppstigende/nedstigende type: Selvlåsende nedfiringsbrems; Tauklemme med kam; Brystklemme; Kombinasjonsklemme; Åttetallsbrems; Fotklemme; Tauklemme med håndtak; Kneklemme; Låsetrinse; Taubrems (rør); Annet